Utah statutes.
31A-23a-207.   Registration of motor club agents.
(1)  Subsection 31A-23a-103(1) does not apply to persons who sell no insurance
products other than motor club service contracts, if those contracts provide
only for those services described in Subsections 31A-11-102(1)(b) through
(1)(f), and personal accident insurance provided automatically with the
purchase of the motor club contract.
(2)  Section 31A-11-110 applies to those persons in Subsection (1).
(3)  Subsection 31A-23a-103(1) applies to persons selling motor club contracts
providing services in addition to those described under Subsections
31A-11-102(1)(b) through (1)(f).
